Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-897
Teachers; inquiries concerning religious affiliation; violations; penalty.

Any person who violates the provisions of section 79-896 is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Violation of such section shall be cause for the removal of any superintendent, member of a board of education or school board, or other public school official.

Laws 1937, c. 180, § 2, p. 711;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-1427;

R.S.1943, § 79-1407;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 369, p. 815;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 258;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1269;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 522.